Utah statutes.
31A-22-624.   Primary care physician.

An accident and health insurance policy that requires an insured to select a primary care physician to receive optimum coverage:

(1)  shall permit an insured to select a participating provider who:

(a)  is an:

(i)  obstetrician;

(ii)  gynecologist; or

(iii)  pediatrician; and

(b)  is qualified and willing to provide primary care services, as defined by the health care plan, as the insured's provider from whom primary care services are received;

(2)  shall clearly state in literature explaining the policy the option available to insureds under Subsection (1); and

(3)  may not impose a higher premium, higher copayment requirement, or any other additional expense on an insured because the insured selected a primary care physician in accordance with Subsection (1).

